Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4620
Receipt of 340B drug; acts prohibited.

(1) Any manufacturer, agent or affiliate of such manufacturer, or third-party logistics provider of such manufacturer's drugs shall not, either directly or indirectly, deny, restrict, or prohibit the acquisition of any 340B drug by or delivery of any 340B drug to any location authorized by any 340B entity to receive such 340B drug, unless receipt of such 340B drug is prohibited by federal law.

(2) Any manufacturer, agent or affiliate of such manufacturer, or third-party logistics provider shall not, either directly or indirectly, require any 340B entity to submit any data, including any claim data, utilization data, encounter data, medical data, purchasing data, or other data, as a condition for allowing the acquisition of any 340B drug by or delivery of any 340B drug to any 340B entity or to any location authorized by any 340B entity to receive such 340B drug, unless such data is required by federal law.

Laws 2025, LB168, § 3.